Maine, session 132, LD2203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3203, sub-§4-D is enacted to read:
4-D. Low-income assistance program; rate limitation. A competitive electricity
provider may not provide to a customer receiving low-income assistance authorized by
section 3214, subsection 2 generation service at a rate that is greater than the standard-offer
service rate established under section 3212 that would otherwise be applicable to that
customer. The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection, including, but
not limited to, rules governing the sharing of low-income assistance customer data by a
transmission and distribution utility with a competitive electricity provider. Rules adopted
under this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR3044(03)